Wyoming, session 2025, SF0057.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 16-9-112 is created to read:
16-9-112. 911 outage reporting.
Any service supplier who owns, operates or controls any
communications equipment necessary for the operation of a
911 emergency reporting system shall, if the failure of the
communications equipment disables, impairs or degrades the
operation of a 911 emergency system to a degree that
materially affects emergency communications through a 911
system, report interruptions of service as required by
rules promulgated by the public service commission.
Section 2. W.S. 16-9-103(k) is amended to read:
16-9-103. Imposition of tax; liability of user for
tax; collection; uncollected amounts; discontinuing service
prohibited.
(k) Effective January 1, 2015, and every fiscal
calendar year through June 30, 2019 thereafter, the
governing body primarily responsible for the expenditure of
revenues collected pursuant to this act shall file with the
Wyoming public service commission a statement of its gross
receipts and expenditures authorized by this act for the
prior fiscal calendar year. The Wyoming public service
commission is authorized to promulgate rules in
consultation with the governing bodies and the Wyoming
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0057
ENROLLED ACT NO. 77, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
public safety communications commission to develop a
statement of revenues and expenditures that, to the maximum
extent possible, is uniform across governing bodies.
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2